North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 16. State Board of Higher Education.

§§ 116-154 through 116-157.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 1244, s. 14.

§ 116-158.
Powers and duties generally.

The Board shall have the following specific powers and duties, in the exercise and performance of which it shall be subject to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 143 of the General Statutes except as herein otherwise provided:

to (8) Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 1244, s. 14.

(9)

Transferred to

G.S. 116-18

by Session Laws 1971, c. 1244, s. 4.

History.

1955, c. 1186, s. 5; 1959, c. 326, ss. 2-7; 1965, c. 1096, s. 3; 1971, c. 1244, ss. 4, 14.

§§ 116-158.1 through 116-158.4.
[Repealed]

Transferred to

G.S. 116-19

to 116-22 by Session Laws 1971, c. 1244, s. 5.

§§ 116-159 through 116-167.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1971, c. 1244, s. 14.